New York, session 2025-2026, A5729.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6450 2 to read as follows: 3 § 6450. Reports of crimes occurring on college campuses. 1. Every 4 college chartered by the regents or incorporated by special act of the 5 legislature shall promptly report all criminal activity on its college 6 campuses and other college property used for educational purposes to the 7 local police agency having jurisdiction over the area in which such 8 campuses or property is located. Every such college shall also report 9 such information, on a monthly basis, to the division of criminal 10 justice services. 11 2. If a college fails to comply with the provisions of this section, 12 such college shall not be eligible to receive any state aid or assist- 13 ance until such failure is cured. 14 § 2. Section 837-a of the executive law is amended by adding a new 15 subdivision 10 to read as follows: 16 10. (a) The division shall receive and compile the data furnished to 17 it by colleges pursuant to section sixty-four hundred fifty of the 18 education law and shall publish such compilation of data in an annual 19 report to the governor and the legislature on college campus crime, 20 which report shall include the division's findings and recommendations 21 with respect thereto. 22 (b) The division shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be 23 necessary to carry out the provisions of this subdivision. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 25 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 26 ment, and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the imple- 27 mentation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made 28 and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09785-01-5